North Carolina, session 2025, HB880.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to North Carolina Agricultural and Technical
State University to provide additional support for NC A&T Aggie Academy, a University of
North Carolina laboratory school established pursuant to Article 29A of Chapter 116 of the
General Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H880-v-1*